District of Columbia statutes.
16-2341

Representation.

(a)

Where a public support burden has been incurred or is threatened, or where an individual seeks assistance pursuant to part D in title IV of the Social Security Act approved January 4, 1975 (88 Stat. 2351; 42 U.S.C. 651 et seq.), the Corporation Counsel or an assistant may bring a civil action in the Family Division to enforce support of any parent or child against an absent parent.

(b)

In all cases over which the Division has jurisdiction under paragraphs (3), (4), (10), and (11) of section 11-1101, where the court deems it necessary and proper, an attorney shall be appointed by the court to represent the respondent.

(c)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with the right of an individual to file a civil action over which the Division has jurisdiction under the paragraphs of section 11-1101 referred to in subsection (b).

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 591, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 544, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 20(a), 23 DCR 2544
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 33(a)(6), 33 DCR 6710
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 10(ff), 45 DCR 745
Family Court of the Superior Court, jurisdiction, see § 11-1101.
1981 Ed., § 16-2341.
1973 Ed., § 16-2341.